Texas statutes.
ESTATES CODE

TITLE 2. ESTATES OF DECEDENTS; DURABLE POWERS OF ATTORNEY

SUBTITLE A. SCOPE, JURISDICTION, VENUE, AND COURTS

CHAPTER 31. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 31.001. SCOPE OF "PROBATE PROCEEDING" FOR PURPOSES OF CODE. The term "probate proceeding," as used in this code, includes:

(1) the probate of a will, with or without administration of the estate;

(2) the issuance of letters testamentary and of administration;

(3) an heirship determination or small estate affidavit, community property administration, and homestead and family allowances;

(4) an application, petition, motion, or action regarding the probate of a will or an estate administration, including a claim for money owed by the decedent;

(5) a claim arising from an estate administration and any action brought on the claim;

(6) the settling of a personal representative's account of an estate and any other matter related to the settlement, partition, or distribution of an estate;

(7) a will construction suit; and

(8) a will modification or reformation proceeding under Subchapter J, Chapter 255.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1351 (S.B. 408), Sec. 13(a), eff. January 1, 2014.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1141 (H.B. 2782), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 31.002. MATTERS RELATED TO PROBATE PROCEEDING. (a) For purposes of this code, in a county in which there is no statutory probate court or county court at law exercising original probate jurisdiction, a matter related to a probate proceeding includes:

(1) an action against a personal representative or former personal representative arising out of the representative's performance of the duties of a personal representative;

(2) an action against a surety of a personal representative or former personal representative;

(3) a claim brought by a personal representative on behalf of an estate;

(4) an action brought against a personal representative in the representative's capacity as personal representative;

(5) an action for trial of title to real property that is estate property, including the enforcement of a lien against the property; and

(6) an action for trial of the right of property that is estate property.

(b) For purposes of this code, in a county in which there is no statutory probate court, but in which there is a county court at law exercising original probate jurisdiction, a matter related to a probate proceeding includes:

(1) all matters and actions described in Subsection (a);

(2) the interpretation and administration of a testamentary trust if the will creating the trust has been admitted to probate in the court; and

(3) the interpretation and administration of an inter vivos trust created by a decedent whose will has been admitted to probate in the court.

(c) For purposes of this code, in a county in which there is a statutory probate court, a matter related to a probate proceeding includes:

(1) all matters and actions described in Subsections (a) and (b); and

(2) any cause of action in which a personal representative of an estate pending in the statutory probate court is a party in the representative's capacity as personal representative.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1351 (S.B. 408), Sec. 13(a), eff. January 1, 2014.